hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX A		 no		 no		drino
SFX A		 ño		 ño		dureño
SFX A		 no		 no		ebruno
SFX A		 no		 no		egrino
SFX A		 no		 no		ejano
SFX A		 no		 no		ejuno
SFX A		 no		 no		electrógeno
SFX A		 no		 no		elino
SFX A		 no		 no		enciano
SFX A		 ño		 ño		eño
SFX A		 no		 no		eógeno
SFX A		 no		 no		erano
SFX A		 no		 no		eriano
SFX A		 no		 no		erino
SFX A		 no		 no		esano
SFX A		 no		 no		etano
SFX A		 no		 no		fiano
SFX A		 no		 no		gano
SFX A		 no		 no		gno
SFX A		 ño		 ño		guadijeño
SFX A		 ño		 ño		gueño
SFX A		 ño		 ño		güeño
SFX A		 no		 no		guino
SFX A		 no		 no		guipuzcoano
SFX A		 no		 no		habano
SFX A		 no		 no		hano
SFX A		 no		 no		iano
SFX A		 no		 no		iberiano
SFX A		 no		 no		icano
SFX A		 no		 no		icino
SFX A		 no		 no		iclino
SFX A		 no		 no		idiano
SFX A		 no		 no		ígeno
SFX A		 ño		 ño		ijeño
SFX A		 ño		 ño		ileño
SFX A		 no		 no		ilino
SFX A		 no		 no		iliturgitano
SFX A		 no		 no		imano
SFX A		 no		 no		indiano
SFX A		 no		 no		ino
SFX A		 no		 no		ipolino
SFX A		 no		 no		isócrono
SFX A		 no		 no		itano
SFX A		 no		 no		iterno
SFX A		 ño		 ño		jeño
SFX A		 no		 no		jordano
SFX A		 ño		 ño		leño
SFX A		 no		 no		liano
SFX A		 no		 no		lino
SFX A		 no		 no		llino
SFX A		 no		 no		malacitano
SFX A		 no		 no		marino
SFX A		 no		 no		mecano
SFX A		 no		 no		mejicano
SFX A		 ño		 ño		meño
SFX A		 no		 no		mesano
SFX A		 no		 no		mesino
SFX A		 no		 no		mino
SFX A		 no		 no		mitano
SFX A		 no		 no		mógeno
SFX A		 no		 no		monoplano
SFX A		 no		 no		montano
SFX A		 no		 no		mundano
SFX A		 no		 no		múrrino
SFX A		 no		 no		nadino
SFX A		 no		 no		nciano
SFX A		 no		 no		ndano
SFX A		 no		 no		ndiano
SFX A		 no		 no		ndrino
SFX A		 no		 no		neógeno
SFX A		 no		 no		neogranadino
SFX A		 no		 no		niano
SFX A		 no		 no		nicano
SFX A		 no		 no		nino
SFX A		 no		 no		no
SFX A		 no		 no		nonágono
SFX A		 no		 no		nono
SFX A		 no		 no		nquino
SFX A		 no		 no		oceno
SFX A		 no		 no		ocristalino
SFX A		 no		 no		óctono
SFX A		 no		 no		odinamógeno
SFX A		 no		 no		odino
SFX A		 no		 no		ógeno
SFX A		 no		 no		ollino
SFX A		 no		 no		ómano
SFX A		 no		 no		omino
SFX A		 no		 no		oniano
SFX A		 no		 no		ono
SFX A		 no		 no		oplano
SFX A		 no		 no		oreno
SFX A		 no		 no		orno
SFX A		 no		 no		orromano
SFX A		 no		 no		osino
SFX A		 no		 no		otidiano
SFX A		 no		 no		palomino
SFX A		 no		 no		peregrino
SFX A		 no		 no		plano
SFX A		 no		 no		politano
SFX A		 ño		 ño		queño
SFX A		 no		 no		queretano
SFX A		 no		 no		quiano
SFX A		 no		 no		quino
SFX A		 no		 no		raceno
SFX A		 no		 no		rafino
SFX A		 no		 no		ramericano
SFX A		 no		 no		rano
SFX A		 no		 no		rciano
SFX A		 no		 no		rdino
SFX A		 no		 no		reano
SFX A		 ño		 ño		redaño
SFX A		 ño		 ño		reño
SFX A		 no		 no		retano
SFX A		 no		 no		riano
SFX A		 ño		 ño		ribeño
SFX A		 no		 no		rino
SFX A		 no		 no		riogeno
SFX A		 no		 no		rmano
SFX A		 no		 no		roniano
SFX A		 no		 no		rono
SFX A		 no		 no		rrano
SFX A		 ño		 ño		rreño
SFX A		 no		 no		rrino
SFX A		 no		 no		rsiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		abeliano
SFX A		 no		 nos		aceno
SFX A		 no		 nos		aciano
SFX A		 no		 nos		acidógeno
SFX A		 no		 nos		adino
SFX A		 no		 nos		africano
SFX A		 no		 nos		agiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ágono
SFX A		 no		 no		sahariano
SFX A		 no		 nos		aino
SFX A		 no		 nos		aíno
SFX A		 no		 no		salamanquino
SFX A		 ño		 ños		aleño
SFX A		 no		 nos		alentino
SFX A		 no		 nos		alino
SFX A		 no		 nos		alógeno
SFX A		 no		 no		salpino
SFX A		 no		 nos		alpino
SFX A		 no		 nos		americano
SFX A		 no		 no		sandino
SFX A		 no		 nos		andino
SFX A		 no		 nos		anglicano
SFX A		 no		 no		sano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ardino
SFX A		 no		 nos		ariano
SFX A		 no		 nos		arino
SFX A		 ño		 ños		arqueño
SFX A		 ño		 ños		arreño
SFX A		 no		 nos		artiniano
SFX A		 no		 nos		aterno
SFX A		 no		 nos		atino
SFX A		 no		 nos		bano
SFX A		 ño		 ños		beño
SFX A		 no		 nos		biano
SFX A		 no		 nos		briano
SFX A		 no		 nos		bruno
SFX A		 no		 nos		cano
SFX A		 no		 nos		cariógeno
SFX A		 no		 nos		carpiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		casiano
SFX A		 ño		 ños		catamarqueño
SFX A		 no		 nos		ciano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ciliano
SFX A		 no		 nos		cino
SFX A		 no		 nos		clino
SFX A		 no		 nos		coreano
SFX A		 no		 nos		criogeno
SFX A		 no		 nos		cristalino
SFX A		 no		 nos		cristiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		crono
SFX A		 no		 nos		cuadrúmano
SFX A		 no		 nos		cubano
SFX A		 no		 nos		dalino
SFX A		 no		 nos		deno
SFX A		 no		 nos		derino
SFX A		 no		 nos		destino
SFX A		 no		 nos		diano
SFX A		 no		 nos		dino
SFX A		 no		 nos		diurno
SFX A		 no		 nos		dógeno
SFX A		 no		 nos		ecino
SFX A		 no		 nos		ejuno
SFX A		 no		 nos		electrógeno
SFX A		 no		 no		selino
SFX A		 no		 nos		elino
SFX A		 no		 nos		emesino
SFX A		 ño		 ños		eño
SFX A		 no		 nos		entino
SFX A		 no		 nos		erano
SFX A		 ño		 ños		ereño
SFX A		 no		 nos		eriano
SFX A		 no		 nos		erino
SFX A		 no		 nos		esano
SFX A		 no		 nos		esiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		esino
SFX A		 no		 nos		estino
SFX A		 no		 nos		etano
SFX A		 no		 nos		fano
SFX A		 ño		 ños		feño
SFX A		 no		 nos		fesino
SFX A		 no		 nos		fino
SFX A		 no		 nos		geno
SFX A		 no		 nos		giano
SFX A		 no		 nos		gno
SFX A		 ño		 ños		guadijeño
SFX A		 ño		 ños		gueño
SFX A		 no		 nos		horaciano
SFX A		 no		 no		siano
SFX A		 no		 nos		iano
SFX A		 no		 nos		iberiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		icano
SFX A		 no		 nos		icino
SFX A		 no		 nos		iclino
SFX A		 no		 nos		idano
SFX A		 no		 nos		idiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ígeno
SFX A		 ño		 ños		igueño
SFX A		 ño		 ños		ijeño
SFX A		 ño		 ños		ileño
SFX A		 no		 nos		iliano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ilino
SFX A		 no		 nos		iliturgitano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ímano
SFX A		 no		 nos		iniano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ino
SFX A		 no		 nos		iógeno
SFX A		 no		 nos		ipolino
SFX A		 no		 nos		isócrono
SFX A		 no		 nos		itano
SFX A		 no		 nos		iterno
SFX A		 no		 nos		jano
SFX A		 ño		 ños		jeño
SFX A		 no		 nos		jordano
SFX A		 no		 nos		lano
SFX A		 no		 nos		latino
SFX A		 ño		 ños		leño
SFX A		 no		 nos		leridano
SFX A		 no		 nos		liano
SFX A		 no		 nos		lícano
SFX A		 no		 nos		lino
SFX A		 no		 nos		lleno
SFX A		 no		 nos		llino
SFX A		 no		 nos		lógeno
SFX A		 no		 nos		lombiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		lvano
SFX A		 ño		 ños		malagueño
SFX A		 no		 no		smarino
SFX A		 no		 nos		mbiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		mecano
SFX A		 ño		 ños		meño
SFX A		 no		 nos		mesano
SFX A		 no		 nos		mesino
SFX A		 no		 nos		metacarpiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		mino
SFX A		 no		 nos		mitano
SFX A		 no		 nos		mógeno
SFX A		 ño		 nos		moño
SFX A		 no		 nos		monoplano
SFX A		 no		 nos		montano
SFX A		 no		 nos		moreno
SFX A		 no		 nos		mundano
SFX A		 no		 nos		nadino
SFX A		 no		 nos		nciano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ndano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ndino
SFX A		 no		 nos		neogranadino
SFX A		 no		 nos		niano
SFX A		 no		 nos		nino
SFX A		 no		 nos		no
SFX A		 no		 nos		nquino
SFX A		 no		 nos		nsilvano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ntino
SFX A		 no		 nos		oano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ocristalino
SFX A		 no		 nos		ocristiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ócrono
SFX A		 no		 nos		óctono
SFX A		 no		 nos		odino
SFX A		 no		 nos		ógeno
SFX A		 no		 nos		olatino
SFX A		 no		 nos		ómano
SFX A		 no		 nos		omino
SFX A		 no		 nos		ono
SFX A		 no		 nos		ontino
SFX A		 no		 nos		oplano
SFX A		 no		 nos		opolitano
SFX A		 no		 nos		oreno
SFX A		 no		 nos		oriano
SFX A		 no		 nos		orromano
SFX A		 no		 nos		oviano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ozano
SFX A		 no		 nos		palino
SFX A		 no		 nos		palomino
SFX A		 no		 nos		pelagiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		pensilvano
SFX A		 no		 nos		piano
SFX A		 no		 nos		pino
SFX A		 no		 nos		plano
SFX A		 no		 nos		politano
SFX A		 ño		 ños		queño
SFX A		 no		 nos		queretano
SFX A		 no		 nos		quiano
SFX A		 no		 nos		raceno
SFX A		 no		 nos		raciano
SFX A		 no		 nos		ramericano
SFX A		 no		 nos		rano
SFX A		 no		 nos		rdino
SFX A		 no		 nos		refino
SFX A		 ño		 ños		reño
SFX A		 no		 nos		rentino
SFX A		 no		 nos		retano
SFX A		 ño		 ños		ribeño
SFX A		 no		 nos		ricano
SFX A		 ño		 ños		rifeño
SFX A		 no		 nos		rino
SFX A		 no		 nos		riogeno
SFX A		 no		 nos		rofano
SFX A		 no		 nos		romano
SFX A		 no		 nos		rono
SFX A		 no		 nos		rrano
